California statutes. Vehicle Code
A nonprofit public benefit corporation governed by the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), which purposes relate to promoting the ability of boys and girls to do things for themselves, to train them in scoutcraft and camping, and to teach them patriotism, courage, self-reliance and kindred virtues, shall not be required to pay the fees provided for in Sections 9853, 9855, and 9860.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 411, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

9871.

Upon application for original registration or transfer of registration of an undocumented vessel, the department may assign an appropriate hull identification number to such vessel whenever there is no hull identification number thereon, or when a hull identification number thereon has been destroyed or obliterated; and such hull identification number shall be permanently marked in an integral part of the hull which is accessible for inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9871.5.

Upon application for renewal of registration of an undocumented vessel, the applicant is required to furnish the hull identification number if the records of the department do not contain such number. If the vessel does not have a hull number, the department may assign an appropriate hull identification number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9872.

No person shall intentionally deface, destroy, or alter the hull identification number of a vessel required to be numbered under this chapter without written authorization from the department; nor shall any person place or stamp any serial or other number or mark upon an undocumented vessel which might interfere with identification of the hull identification number. This does not prohibit the restoration by an owner of an original number or mark when the restoration is authorized by the department, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing, in the ordinary course of business, numbers or marks upon new vessels or new parts thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 617, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

9872.1.

(a) No person shall knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, or have in his or her possession any vessel, or component part thereof, from which the hull identification number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, unless the vessel or component part has attached thereto a hull identification number assigned or approved by the department in lieu of the manufacturer’s number.

(b) Whenever a vessel, or component part thereof, from which the hull identification
 number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, and which does not have attached thereto an assigned or approved number as described in subdivision (a), comes into the custody of a peace officer, the seized vessel or component part is subject, in accordance with the procedures specified in this section, to impoundment and to such disposition as may be provided by order of a court having jurisdiction. This subdivision does not apply with respect to a seized vessel or component part used as evidence in any criminal action or proceeding.

(c) Whenever a vessel or component part described in subdivision (a) comes into the custody of a peace officer, any person from whom the property was seized, and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is on registration records in the department, shall be notified within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the seizure, of the date, time, and place of the hearing
 required in subdivision (e). The notice shall contain the information specified in subdivision (d).

(d) Whenever a peace officer seizes a vessel or component part as provided in subdivision (b), any person from whom the property was seized shall be provided a notice of impoundment of the vessel or component part which shall serve as a receipt and contain the following information:

(1) Name and address of person from whom the property was seized.

(2) A statement that the vessel or component part seized has been impounded for investigation of a violation of this section and that the property will be released upon a determination that the hull identification number has not been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, or upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership of the vessel or component part,
 provided that no other person claims an interest in the property; otherwise, a hearing regarding the disposition of the vessel or component part shall take place in the proper court.

(3) A statement that any person from whom the property was seized, and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is on registration records in the department, will receive written notification of the date, time, and place of the hearing within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the seizure.

(4) Name and address of the law enforcement agency where evidence of ownership of the vessel or component part may be presented.

(5) A statement of the contents of this section.

(e) A hearing on the disposition of the property shall be held by the
 superior court within 60 days after the seizure. The hearing shall be before the court without a jury. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case.

(1) If the evidence reveals either that the hull identification number has not been removed, altered, or destroyed or that the hull identification number has been removed, altered, or destroyed but satisfactory evidence of ownership has been presented to the seizing agency or court, the property shall be released to the person entitled thereto.

(2) If the evidence reveals that the hull identification number has been removed, altered, or destroyed, and satisfactory evidence of ownership has not been presented, the property shall be destroyed, sold, or otherwise disposed of as provided by court order.

(3) At the hearing, the seizing agency shall have the burden
 of establishing that the hull identification number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed and that no satisfactory evidence of ownership has been presented.

(f) Nothing in this section precludes the return of a seized vessel or component part to the owner by the seizing agency following presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership and, if determined necessary, upon the assignment of an identification number to the vessel or component part by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 595.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9872.5.

No certificate of ownership shall be issued under this chapter for any “amphibious vehicle” for which a certificate of ownership may be issued by the department under other provisions of this code.

For the purposes of this section, an “amphibious vehicle” is a device by which any person or property may be propelled, moved, or drawn, both upon water and upon a highway on land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1439.)
-------------------------------------------

9873.

An undocumented vessel shall not be required to be numbered under this chapter if it is:

(a) Already covered by a number in full force and effect that has been issued to it pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state; provided, that such undocumented vessel shall be subject to the numbering requirements of this chapter if it has changed its state of principal use and has been within this state for a period in excess of
 60 consecutive days.

(b) A vessel from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of this state.

(c) A public vessel of the United States, another state or subdivision thereof or municipality of such other state.

(d) A ship’s lifeboat.

(e) Any vessel belonging to a class of boats that has been exempted from numbering by the department after the department has found that the numbering of vessels of such class will not materially aid in their identification; and, if any agency of the federal
 government has a numbering system applicable to the class of vessels to which the vessel in question belongs, after the department has further found that the vessel would also be exempt from numbering if it were subject to the federal law. An undocumented vessel propelled solely by oars or paddles and an undocumented vessel eight feet or less propelled solely by sail are exempt from this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 67.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9874.

The department may suspend, cancel, or revoke the registration of a vessel, a certificate of number, sticker, certificate of ownership, or temporary certificate of number in any of the following cases:

(a) When the department is satisfied that the registration or the certificate of number, sticker, certificate of ownership, or temporary certificate of number was fraudulently obtained or erroneously issued.

(b) When the department determines that the required fee has not been paid and the same is not paid upon reasonable notice and
 demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9875.

Except as provided in Section 40000.8, any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the department adopted pursuant to this chapter is guilty of an infraction, punishable under Section 42001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 922, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

9880.

(a) The department shall not renew the certificate of number of, or allow a transfer of any title to or interest in, a vessel if the county tax collector has notified the department pursuant to Section 3205 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, that taxes are delinquent upon the vessel, and the department shall not subsequently issue a certificate of number for, or a new certificate of ownership reflecting a transfer of title to or interest in, that vessel until the department receives a certificate of clearance from the county tax collector that
 the delinquent taxes have been paid on that vessel or until the county tax collector has provided notice to the department that the delinquency has been satisfied.

(b) The department shall record the notice of delinquent taxes on the vessel. If the department is notified by the county tax collector that the delinquency has been satisfied, the department shall, if all other requirements are satisfied, issue a certificate of number for, or a new certificate of ownership reflecting a transfer of title to or interest in, the vessel. The department shall assess a fee upon each county tax collector in an amount that is sufficient to reimburse the department for its actual costs of administering this section.

(c) Whenever a vessel subject to this section is transferred, or not renewed for 26 months, the department shall notify the county tax collector of that fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 546, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Transfer of Title or Interest in Undocumented Vessel [9900. - 9928.]

9900.

No transfer of the title or any interest in or to an undocumented vessel numbered under this code shall pass, and any attempted transfer shall not be effective, until the parties thereto have paid any delinquent property taxes with respect to that vessel and fulfilled either of the following requirements:

(a) The transferor has made proper endorsement and delivery of the certificate of ownership to the transferee as provided in this code and the transferee has delivered to the department or has placed the certificates in the United States mail addressed to the department when and as required under this code with the proper transfer fee and thereby makes application for a new certificate of ownership and a new certificate of number.

(b) The transferor has delivered to the department or has placed in the United States mail addressed to the department the appropriate documents for the transfer of ownership of the vessel pursuant to the sale or transfer except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 940, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 940.)
-------------------------------------------

9901.

Whenever any person has received as transferee a properly endorsed certificate of ownership, he or she shall, within 10 days thereafter, forward the certificates with the transfer fee specified in Section 9855 to the department, and thereby make application for a certificate of ownership and certificate of number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9902.

The department, upon receipt of a properly endorsed certificate of ownership and a new application form and the required fee, shall issue a new certificate of ownership and a new certificate of number in the same manner as provided for in the initial issuance of number and the number may be reassigned to the new owner, provided, however, in the case of a transfer of a part interest which does not affect the owner’s right to operate such undocumented vessel the transfer shall not terminate the certificate of number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

9903.

(a) Prior to the issuance of any certificate of ownership the department shall obtain a statement in writing, signed by the transferee or transferor, showing:

(1) The date of the sale or other transfer of ownership of the vessel.

(2) The name and address of the seller or transferor.

(3) The name and address of the buyer or transferee.

(4) The total consideration (valued in money) given for the sale or other transfer of the vessel, including any motor or other component part of the vessel included in the sale or other transfer.

(b) Upon the transfer of ownership of a vessel the department shall forward to the State Board of Equalization information from its records identifying the vessel together with the data required by subdivision (a). The information shall be transmitted as promptly as feasible and in such form and manner as shall be agreed between the department and the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9905.

An owner who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of an undocumented vessel and has delivered possession of the vessel to a purchaser shall not by reason of any of the provisions of this code or the Harbors and Navigation Code be deemed the owner of the vessel so as to be subject to civil liability for the operation of the vessel thereafter by another when the owner, in addition to the foregoing, has fulfilled either of the following requirements:

(a) Made proper endorsement and delivery of the certificate of ownership as provided in this code. 

(b) Delivered to the department or placed in the United States mail, addressed to the department, either the notice as provided in Sections 9911 and 9912 or appropriate documents for transfer of the vessel pursuant to the sale or transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 23.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

9906.

A legal owner may assign his title or interest in or to an undocumented vessel numbered under this code to a person other than the owner without the consent of and without affecting the interest of the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9907.

Upon transfer of the title or any interest of the legal owner or legal owners in an undocumented vessel numbered under this code, the transferor shall write his signature, and the transferee shall write his signature and address, in the appropriate spaces provided upon the reverse side of the certificate of ownership issued for the vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9908.

Upon transfer of the title or interest or any part thereof of the registered owner only in an undocumented vessel numbered under this code, the registered owner shall write his signature and address and the transferee shall write his signature and address in the appropriate spaces provided on the reverse side of the certificate of ownership for the vessel, and the legal owner shall write his signature in the space provided for the new legal owner indicating that he is to retain his legal title and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9909.

When the required certificate of ownership is lost, stolen, damaged, or mutilated, application for transfer may be made upon a form provided by the department for a duplicate certificate of ownership. The transferor shall write his signature and address in the appropriate spaces provided upon the application and file the same together with the proper fees for duplicate certificate of ownership and transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9910.

It is unlawful for any person to fail or neglect to deliver the certificate of number and, when having possession, to properly endorse, date, and deliver the certificate of ownership to a transferee who is lawfully entitled to a transfer of ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9911.

Whenever the owner of an undocumented vessel numbered under this code sells or transfers his or her title or interest in, or any part thereof, and delivers the possession of, the vessel to another, the owner shall, within five calendar days, notify the department of the sale or transfer by giving the date thereof, the name and address of the owner and of the transferee and a description of the vessel as may be required in the appropriate form provided for the purpose by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9912.

Every dealer upon transferring by sale, lease or otherwise any undocumented vessel, whether new or used, required to be numbered under this code, shall, not later than the end of the next business day of the dealer, give written notice of the transfer to the department upon an appropriate form provided by it, but a dealer need not give the notice when selling or transferring a new unnumbered vessel to another dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9913.

When a security interest upon a numbered vessel is satisfied, canceled, or released by the parties thereto who are the registered owner and legal owner respectively of said vessel and thereafter within a period of 10 days a new security interest covering the vessel is executed between the same parties, no application for transfer of ownership by reason thereof shall be made, no new certificate of ownership or certificate of number shall be issued, and all provisions of this code relating to transfers of any title or interest in a vessel shall be deemed to have been fully complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9914.

The transferee of a security interest in the interest of a legal owner of a numbered vessel need not make application for a transfer of ownership when the security interest arises from a pledge of security agreement by the legal owner to the pledgee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9915.

(a) Whenever the title or interest of any owner or legal owner in or to a vessel numbered under this code passes to another otherwise than by a voluntary transfer, the new owner or legal owner may obtain a transfer of ownership upon application therefor and upon presentation of the last certificate of ownership and certificate of number issued for the vessel, if available, and any instruments or documents of authority or certified copies thereof as may be required by the department, or required by law, to evidence or effect a transfer of title or interest in or to chattels in such case.

(b) The department when satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of the transfer shall give notice by mail to the owner and legal owner of the vessel as shown by the records of the department and five days after the giving of the notice, if still satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of such transfer, shall transfer the ownership of the vessel accordingly and issue a new certificate of ownership and cerificate of number to the person or persons entitled thereto. Such notice shall not be required for an involuntary transfer when repossession involves a secured party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

9916.

(a) If 40 days have elapsed since the death of an owner or legal owner of any vessel numbered under this division without the decedent leaving other property necessitating probate, and irrespective of the value of the vessel, the following person may secure a transfer of ownership of the title or interest of the decedent:

(1) The sole person or all of the persons who succeeded to the property of the decedent under Sections 6401 and 6402 of the Probate Code unless the vessel is, by will, otherwise bequeathed.

(2) The sole beneficiary or all of the beneficiaries who succeeded to the vessel under the will of the decedent where the vessel is, by will, so bequeathed.

(b) The person authorized by subdivision (a) may secure a transfer of ownership of the title or interest of the decedent upon presenting to the department all of the following:

(1) The appropriate certificate of ownership and certificate of number, if available.

(2) A certificate of the heir or beneficiary under penalty of perjury containing the following statements:

(A) The date and place of the decedent’s death.

(B) The decedent left no other property necessitating probate and no probate proceeding is now being or has been conducted in this state for the decedent’s estate.

(C) The declarant is entitled to the vessel either (i) as the sole person or all of the persons who succeeded to the property of the decedent under Sections 6401 and 6402 of the Probate Code if the decedent left no will or (ii) as the beneficiary or beneficiaries under the decedent’s last will if the decedent left a will, and no one has a right to the decedent’s vessel that is superior to that of the declarant.

(D) There are no unsecured creditors of the decedent or, if there are, the unsecured creditors of the decedent have been paid in full or their claims have been otherwise discharged.

(3) If required by the department, a certificate of the death of the decedent. 

(4) If required by the department, the names and addresses of any other heirs or beneficiaries.

(c) If the department is presented with the documents specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), no liability shall be incurred by the department or any officer or employee of the department by reason of the transfer of registration of the vessel pursuant to this section. The department or officer or employee of the department may rely in good faith on the statements in the certificate specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and has no duty to inquire into the truth of any statement in the certificate. The person who secures the transfer of the vessel pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of Section 13109 to 13113, inclusive, of the Probate Code to the same extent as a person to whom transfer of property is made under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 783, Sec. 27.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

9916.5.

(a) On death of the owner of a vessel numbered under this division and owned in beneficiary form, the vessel belongs to the surviving beneficiary, if any. If there is no surviving beneficiary, the vessel belongs to the estate of the deceased owner. 

(b) A certificate of ownership in beneficiary form may be revoked or the beneficiary changed at any time before the death of the owner by either of the following methods: 

(1) By sale of the vessel with property assignment and delivery of the certificate of ownership to another person. 

(2) By application for a new certificate of ownership without designation of a beneficiary or with the designation of a different beneficiary. 

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), designation of a beneficiary in a certificate of ownership issued in beneficiary form may not be changed or revoked by will, by any other instrument, by a change of circumstances, or otherwise. 

(d) The beneficiary’s interest in the vessel at death of the owner is subject to any contract of sale, assignment, or security interest to which the owner was subject during his or her lifetime. 

(e) The surviving beneficiary may secure a transfer of ownership for the vessel upon presenting to the department all of the following: 

(1) The appropriate certificate of ownership. 

(2) A certificate under penalty of perjury stating the date and place of the owner’s death and that the declarant is entitled to the vessel as the designated beneficiary. 

(3) If required by the department, a certificate of the death of the owner. 

(f) After the death of the owner, the surviving beneficiary may transfer his or her interest in the vessel to another person without securing transfer of ownership into his or her own name by appropriately signing the certificate of ownership for the vessel and delivering the document to the transferee for forwarding to the department with appropriate fees. The transferee may secure a transfer of ownership upon presenting to the department (1) the certificate of title signed by the beneficiary, (2) the certificate described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) executed by the beneficiary under penalty of perjury, and (3) if required by the department, a certificate of death of the owner. 

(g) A transfer at death pursuant to this section is effective by reason of this section, and shall not be deemed to be a testamentary disposition of property. The right of the designated beneficiary to the vessel shall not be denied, abridged, or affected on the grounds that the right has not been created by a writing executed in accordance with the laws of this state prescribing the requirements to effect a valid testamentary disposition of property. 

(h) A transfer at death pursuant to this section is subject to Section 9653 of the Probate Code. 

(i) If there is no surviving beneficiary, the person or persons described in Section 9916 may secure transfer of the vessel as provided in that section. 

(j) The department may prescribe forms for use pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 62.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

9916.7.

(a) If the department makes a transfer pursuant to Section 9916.5, the department is discharged from all liability, whether or not the transfer is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the vessel transferred. 

(b) The protection provided by subdivision (a) does not extend to a transfer made after the department has been served with a court order restraining the transfer. No other notice or information shown to have been available to the department shall affect its right to the protection afforded by subdivision (a). 

(c) The protection provided by this section has no bearing on the rights of parties in disputes between themselves or their successors concerning the beneficial ownership of the vessel. 

(d) The protection provided by this section is in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other protection provided to the department by any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 63.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

9917.

Whenever application is made to the department for a transfer of ownership of a vessel to a new owner or legal owner and the applicant is unable to present the certificate of ownership issued for the vessel by reason of the same being lost or otherwise not available, the department may receive the application and examine into the circumstances of the case and may require the filing of affidavits or other information, and when the department is satisfied that the applicant is entitled to a transfer of ownership, the department may transfer the ownership of the vessel, and issue a new certificate of ownership, and certificate of number to the person or persons found to be entitled thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

9918.

If the application for a transfer is made in the manner provided in this code, the department shall not be required to withhold the transfer of any right, title or interest in or to a vessel if the application on its face appears to be genuine and regular and the department has received neither a request from any law enforcement agency that action on the application be deferred nor an order of a court of the United States or of the State of California restraining the transfer within two years prior thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9919.

No security interest in any vessel numbered under this code, irrespective of whether such number was effected prior or subsequent to the creation of such security interest, is perfected, until the secured party, or his successor or assignee, has deposited with the department a properly endorsed certificate of ownership to the vessel, subject to the security interest, showing the secured party as legal owner if the vessel is then numbered under this code; or if the vessel is not so numbered, the owner shall file an initial application for number as provided for in this code, and the certificate of ownership issued under said application shall contain the name and address of the legal owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9920.

When the secured party, his successor or assignee, has deposited with the department a properly endorsed certificate of ownership showing the secured party as legal owner, or if the vessel is not numbered when the owner shall file an initial application for number as provided for in this code, and the certificate of ownership issued under said application shows said secured party as the legal owner, and said certificate of ownership is deposited with the department, the deposit constitutes perfection of the security interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9921.

Upon the deposit with the department of the certificate of ownership showing the secured party as legal owner as provided in Section 9919 hereof, the department shall on its records show the secured party, his successor or assignee, as legal owner with respect to such vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9922.

The method provided in this chapter for perfecting a security interest in a vessel numbered under this code is exclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9923.

In the absence of the regularly required supporting evidence of ownership upon application for registration or transfer of a vessel, the department may accept an undertaking or bond in the amount of the fair market value of the vessel at the time of the application, as determined by the department, which shall be conditioned to protect the department and all officers and employees thereof and any subsequent purchaser of the vessel, any person acquiring a lien or security interest thereon, or the successor in interest of such purchaser or person, against any loss or damage on account of any defect in or undisclosed claim upon the right, title, and interest of the applicant or other person in and to the vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9924.

In the event the vessel is no longer registered in this state and the currently valid certificate of ownership is surrendered to the department or the vessel has been destroyed or lost, the bond or undertaking shall be returned and surrendered after three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

9928.

The department shall withhold the certificate of number or the transfer of registration of any vessel sold at retail to any applicant by any person other than a person holding a seller’s permit pursuant to Section 6066 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and regularly engaged in the business of selling vessels, until the applicant pays to the department the use tax measured by the sales price of the vessel as required by the Sales and Use Tax Law, together with penalty, if any, unless the State Board of Equalization finds that no use tax is due. If the applicant so desires, he may pay the use tax and penalty, if any, to the department so as to secure immediate action upon his application for registration or transfer of registration and thereafter he may apply through the Department of Motor Vehicles to the State Board of Equalization under the provisions of the Sales and Use Tax Law for a refund of the amount so paid.

(b) The department shall transmit to the State Board of Equalization all collections of the use tax and penalty made under this section. This transmittal shall be made at least monthly, accompanied by a schedule in such form as the department and board may prescribe.

(c) The State Board of Equalization shall reimburse the department for its costs incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section.

(d) In computing any use tax or penalty thereon under the provisions of the section, dollar fractions shall be disregarded in the manner specified in Section 9559. Payment of tax and penalty on this basis shall be deemed full compliance with the requirements of the Sales and Use Tax Law insofar as they are applicable to the use of vessels to which this section relates.

(e) The department and the State Board of Equalization shall enter into an agreement for the collection of the use tax pursuant to this section and Section 6294 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The agreement shall specify the procedures agreed upon by the department and the board for collection of the tax and the reimbursement provided for in subdivision (c). The agreement shall be approved by the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 665, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3.6. VEHICLE SALES [9950. - 9993.]



CHAPTER 1. Advertising, Brochures, and Manuals [9950. - 9955.]

9950.

Any advertisement, brochure, owner’s manual, or sales manual relating to any gasoline-powered motor vehicle of a type subject to registration with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of under 6,000 pounds of 1972 or later year model which contains any reference to the horsepower of the engine of the vehicle shall state only the Society of Automotive Engineers horsepower rating of such engine, as installed (net), as determined by S.A.E. Standard J1349.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1212, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9951.

(a) A manufacturer of a new motor vehicle sold or leased in this state that is equipped with one or more recording devices commonly referred to as “event data recorders (EDR)” or “sensing and diagnostic modules (SDM),” shall disclose that fact in the owner’s manual for the vehicle.

(b) As used in this section, “recording device” means a device that is installed by the manufacturer of the vehicle and does one or more of the following, for the purpose of retrieving data after an
 accident:

(1) Records how fast and in which direction the motor vehicle is traveling.

(2) Records a history of where the motor vehicle travels.

(3) Records steering performance.

(4) Records brake performance, including, but not limited to, whether brakes were applied before an accident.

(5) Records the driver’s seatbelt status.

(6) Has the ability to transmit information concerning an accident in which the motor vehicle has been involved to a central communications system when an accident occurs.

(c) Data described in subdivision (b) that is recorded on a
 recording device may not be downloaded or otherwise retrieved by a person other than the registered owner of the motor vehicle, except under one of the following circumstances:

(1) The registered owner of the motor vehicle consents to the retrieval of the information.

(2) In response to an order of a court having jurisdiction to issue the order.

(3) For the purpose of improving motor vehicle safety, including for medical research of the human body’s reaction to motor vehicle accidents, and the identity of the registered owner or driver is not disclosed in connection with that retrieved data. The disclosure of the vehicle identification number (VIN) for the purpose of improving vehicle safety, including for medical research of the human body’s reaction to motor vehicle accidents, does not constitute the disclosure of
 the identity of the registered owner or driver.

(4) The data is retrieved by a licensed new motor vehicle dealer, or by an automotive technician as defined in Section 9880.1 of the Business and Professions Code, for the purpose of diagnosing, servicing, or repairing the motor vehicle.

(d) A person authorized to download or otherwise retrieve data from a recording device pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), may not release that data, except to share the data among the motor vehicle safety and medical research communities to advance motor vehicle safety, and only if the identity of the registered owner or driver is not disclosed.

(e) (1) If a motor vehicle is equipped with a recording device that is capable of recording or transmitting information as described in paragraph (2) or (6) of
 subdivision (b) and that capability is part of a subscription service, the fact that the information may be recorded or transmitted shall be disclosed in the subscription service agreement.

(2) Subdivision (c) does not apply to subscription services meeting the requirements of paragraph (1).

(f) This section applies to all motor vehicles manufactured on or after July 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 350.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9952.

Any person who publishes, or causes to be published, or offers for sale or sells, or gives to another person, any advertisement, brochure, owner’s manual, or sales manual which violates Section 9950 is guilty of an infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

9953.

Every manufacturer of a new motor vehicle sold in this state which, as equipped, may not be operated with tire chains shall do both of the following:

(a) Indicate that fact in the owner’s manual for the vehicle or other written material provided by the manufacturer regarding the vehicle. 
